Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 2 Power of Adjustment and Unitrusts

53-12-360.
Duty of trustee as to receipts and disbursements within scope of Article 17.

In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income and with respect to any matter within the scope of Article 17 of this chapter:

A trustee shall administer a trust in accordance with the governing trust instrument, even if there is a different provision in Article 17 of this chapter;

A trustee may administer a trust by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of Article 17 of this chapter given to the trustee by the governing trust instrument, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by Article 17 of this chapter. No inference that the trustee has improperly exercised the discretionary power shall arise from the fact that the trustee has made an allocation contrary to a provision of Article 17 of this chapter;

A trustee shall administer a trust in accordance with Article 17 of this chapter if the governing trust instrument does not contain a different provision or does not give the trustee a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of Article 17 of this chapter; and

A trustee shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the governing trust instrument and Article 17 of this chapter do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-360

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-361.
Power of adjustment.

Subject to subsections (c) and (f) of this Code section, a trustee may adjust between principal and income by allocating an amount of income to principal or an amount of principal to income to the extent the trustee considers appropriate if:

The governing trust instrument describes what may or shall be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust’s income; and

The trustee determines, after applying the rules in Code Section 53-12-360, that the trustee is unable to comply with Code Section 53-12-247.

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by subsection (a) of this Code section, a trustee may consider, among other things:

The size of the trust;

The nature and estimated duration of the trust;

The liquidity and distribution requirements of the trust;

The needs for regular distributions and preservation and appreciation of capital;

The expected tax consequences of an adjustment;

The net amount allocated to income under this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

The assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, and tangible and intangible personal property or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor or testator;

To the extent reasonably known to the trustee, the needs of the beneficiaries for present and future distributions authorized or required by the governing trust instrument;

Whether and to what extent the governing trust instrument gives the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibits the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

The intent of the settlor or testator; and

The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation on the trust.

A trustee shall not make an adjustment under this Code section:

If the adjustment would change the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

If the adjustment is from trust funds which are permanently set aside for charitable purposes under the governing trust instrument and for which a federal charitable, estate, or gift tax deduction has been taken, unless both income and principal are so set aside;

If:

Possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment would cause an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes; and

The individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If:

Possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment would cause all or part of the trust assets to be subject to federal estate, gift, or generation-skipping transfer tax with respect to an individual; and

The assets would not be subject to federal estate, gift, or generation-skipping tax with respect to the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

If the trust has been converted under Code Section 53-12-362.

If paragraph (3), (4), or (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section applies to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a cotrustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee is prohibited by the governing trust instrument.

If paragraph (2) of this subsection applies, a trustee may release:

The entire power conferred by subsection (a) of this Code section;

The power to adjust from income to principal; or

The power to adjust from principal to income.

A release under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be permissible if:

The trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in paragraphs (1) through (6) of subsection (c) of this Code section; or

The trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

A governing trust instrument which limits the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income shall not affect the application of this Code section unless it is clear from the governing trust instrument that it is intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred by subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-361

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-362.
Conversion to unitrust.

Unless expressly prohibited by the trust instrument, a trustee may release the power to adjust under Code Section 53-12-361 and convert a trust into a unitrust as described in this Code section if:

The trustee determines that the conversion will enable such trustee to better carry out the intent of the settlor or testator and the purposes of the trust;

The trustee gives written notice of such trustee’s intention to release the power to adjust and to convert the trust into a unitrust and of how the unitrust will operate, including what initial decisions such trustee will make under this Code section, to:

The settlor, if living;

All living persons who are currently receiving or eligible to receive distributions of income of the trust; and

Without regard to the exercise of any power of appointment, all living persons who would receive principal of the trust if the trust were to terminate at the time of the giving of such notice and all living persons who would receive or be eligible to receive distributions of income or principal of the trust if the interests of all of the beneficiaries currently eligible to receive income under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph were to terminate at the time of the giving of such notice.

At least one person receiving notice under each of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection is legally competent; and

No beneficiary objects to the conversion to a unitrust in a writing delivered to the trustee within 60 days of the mailing of the notice under paragraph (2) of this subsection.

The trustee may petition the superior court to order the conversion to a unitrust.

A beneficiary may request a trustee to convert to a unitrust. If the trustee does not convert, the beneficiary may petition the superior court to order the conversion.

The court shall order conversion if the court concludes that the conversion will enable the trustee to better carry out the intent of the settlor or testator and the purposes of the trust.

In deciding whether to exercise the power to convert to a unitrust as provided by subsection (a) of this Code section, a trustee may consider, among other things:

The size of the trust;

The nature and estimated duration of the trust;

The liquidity and distribution requirements of the trust;

The needs for regular distributions and preservation and appreciation of capital;

The expected tax consequences of the conversion;

The assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, and tangible and intangible personal property or real property; and the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary;

To the extent reasonably known to the trustee, the needs of the beneficiaries for present and future distributions authorized or required by the governing trust instrument;

Whether and to what extent the governing trust instrument gives the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibits the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income; and

The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation on the trust.

After a trust is converted to a unitrust:

The trustee shall follow an investment policy seeking a total return for the investments held by the trust, whether the return is to be derived from:

Appreciation of capital;

Earnings and distributions from capital; or

Both appreciation of capital and earnings and distributions from capital;

The trustee shall make regular distributions in accordance with the governing trust instrument construed in accordance with the provisions of this Code section;

The term “income” in the governing trust instrument shall mean an annual unitrust distribution equal to 4 percent of the net fair market value of the trust’s assets or the payout percentage ordered under paragraph (1) of subsection (g) of this Code section, whether such assets would be considered income or principal under other provisions of this article and Article 17 of this chapter, averaged over the lesser of:

The three preceding years; or

The period during which the trust has been in existence;

The trustee can determine the fair market value of the property in the trust by appraisal or other reasonable method or estimate; and

The fair market value of the trust property shall not include the value of any residential property or any tangible personal property that, as of the first business day of the current valuation year, one or more of the current beneficiaries of the trust have or had the right to occupy or have had the right to possess or control, other than in his or her capacity as trustee of the trust, and instead the right of occupancy or the right to possession or control shall be deemed to be the unitrust amount with respect to such residential property.

The trustee may in the trustee’s discretion from time to time determine:

The effective date of a conversion to a unitrust;

The provisions for prorating a unitrust distribution for a short year in which a beneficiary’s right to payments commences or ceases;

The frequency of unitrust distributions during the year;

The effect of other payments from or contributions to the trust on the trust’s valuation;

Whether to value the trust’s assets annually or more frequently;

What valuation dates to use;

How frequently to value nonliquid assets and whether to estimate their value; and

Any other matters necessary for the proper functioning of the unitrust.

Expenses which would be deducted from income if the trust were not a unitrust shall not be deducted from the unitrust distribution.

The unitrust distribution shall be paid from net income, as such term would be determined if the trust were not a unitrust. To the extent net income is insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid from net realized short-term capital gains. To the extent income and net realized short-term capital gains are insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid from net realized long-term capital gains. To the extent income and net realized short-term and long-term capital gains are insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid from the principal of the trust.

The trustee or, if the trustee declines to do so, a beneficiary may petition the superior court to:

Select a payout percentage different from 4 percent but not lower than 3 percent or higher than 5 percent;

Provide for a distribution of net income, as would be determined if the trust were not a unitrust, in excess of the unitrust distribution if such distribution is necessary to preserve a tax benefit;

Average the valuation of the trust’s net assets over a period other than three years; or

Reconvert from a unitrust. Upon a reconversion, the power to adjust under Code Section 53-12-361 shall be revived.

A conversion to a unitrust shall not affect a provision in the governing trust instrument directing or authorizing the trustee to distribute principal or authorizing a beneficiary to withdraw a portion or all of the principal.

A trustee shall not convert a trust into a unitrust:

If payment of the unitrust distribution would change the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

If the unitrust distribution would be made from trust funds which are permanently set aside for charitable purposes under the governing trust instrument and for which a federal charitable, estate, or gift tax deduction has been taken, unless both income and principal are so set aside;

If:

Possessing or exercising the power to convert would cause an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes; and

The individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to convert; or

If:

Possessing or exercising the power to convert would cause all or part of the trust assets to be subject to federal estate, gift, or generation-skipping transfer tax with respect to an individual; and

The assets would not be subject to federal estate, gift, or generation-skipping transfer tax with respect to the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to convert.

If paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (i) of this Code section applies to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a cotrustee to whom such provision does not apply may convert the trust unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee is prohibited by the governing trust instrument.

If paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (i) of this Code section applies to all the trustees, the trustees may petition the superior court to direct a conversion.

A trustee may release the power conferred by subsection (a) of this Code section to convert to a unitrust if:

The trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power to convert will cause a result described in paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (i) of this Code section; or

The trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power to convert will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (i) of this Code section.

The release of the power to convert may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-362

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 24/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-363.
Abuse of trustee’s discretion.

A court shall not change a trustee’s decision to exercise or not to exercise a discretionary power conferred by Code Section 53-12-361 or 53-12-362 unless it determines that the decision was an abuse of the trustee’s discretion.

The decisions to which subsection (a) of this Code section applies include:

A determination of whether and to what extent an amount should be transferred from principal to income or from income to principal; and

A determination of the factors that are relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, the extent to which they are relevant, and the weight, if any, to be given to the relevant factors in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by Code Section 53-12-361 or 53-12-362.

If a court determines that a trustee has abused its discretion regarding a discretionary power conferred by Code Section 53-12-361 or 53-12-362, the remedy shall be to restore the income and remainder beneficiaries to the positions they would have occupied if the trustee had not abused its discretion according to the following rules:

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in no distribution to a beneficiary or a distribution which is too small, the court shall require the trustee to distribute from the trust to the beneficiary an amount that the court determines will restore the beneficiary, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary’s appropriate position;

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary which is too large, the court shall restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in whole or in part, to their appropriate positions by requiring the trustee to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to the beneficiary who received the distribution that was too large or requiring that beneficiary or that beneficiary’s estate to return some or all of the distribution to the trust, notwithstanding a spendthrift provision or similar provision;

If the abuse of discretion concerns the power to convert a trust into a unitrust, the court shall require the trustee either to convert into a unitrust or to reconvert from a unitrust; and

To the extent that the court is unable, after applying paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection, to restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both to the positions they would have occupied if the trustee had not abused its discretion, the court may require the trustee to pay an appropriate amount from its own funds to one or more of the beneficiaries, the trust, or both.

No provision of this Code section or Code Section 53-12-361 or 53-12-362 is intended to require a trustee to make an adjustment under Code Section 53-12-361 or a conversion under Code Section 53-12-362.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-363

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-364.
Express total return unitrusts.

The following provisions shall apply to a trust which by its governing trust instrument requires the distribution at least annually of a unitrust amount equal to a fixed percentage of not less than 3 percent nor more than 5 percent per year of the net fair market value of the trust’s assets, valued at least annually, such trust to be referred to as an “express total return unitrust”:

The unitrust amount may be determined by reference to the net fair market value of the trust’s assets in one year or more than one year;

Distribution of such a fixed percentage unitrust amount shall be considered a distribution of all of the income of the total return unitrust and shall not be considered a fundamental departure from applicable state law, regardless of whether the total return unitrust is created and governed by Code Section 53-12-362 or by the provisions of the governing trust instrument;

Such a distribution of the fixed percentage of not less than 3 percent nor more than 5 percent shall be considered a reasonable apportionment of the total return of a total return unitrust;

The governing trust instrument may grant discretion to the trustee to adopt a consistent practice of treating capital gains as part of the unitrust distribution, to the extent that the unitrust distribution exceeds the net accounting income, or it may specify the ordering of such classes of income;

Unless the trust provisions specifically provide otherwise, or grant discretion to the trustee as set forth in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a distribution of the unitrust amount shall be considered to have been made from the following sources in order of priority:

From net accounting income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

From ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

From net realized short-term capital gains;

From net realized long-term capital gains; and

From the principal of the trust estate; and

The trust document may provide that assets used by the trust beneficiary, such as a residence property or tangible personal property, may be excluded from the net fair market value for computing the unitrust amount. Such use may be considered equivalent to the income or unitrust amount.

A trust which provides for a fixed percentage payout in excess of 5 percent per year shall be considered to have paid out all of the income of the total return unitrust and to have paid out principal of such trust to the extent that the fixed percentage payout exceeds 5 percent per year.

This Code section shall be effective for trusts established and wills executed on or after July 1, 2010.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-364

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.